District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.43

Repealed

Officers — Powers authorized.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 197, ch. 269, § 43
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(n), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.43.
1981 Ed., § 29-343.
1973 Ed., § 29-919.